District of Columbia statutes.
44-109.01

Responsibilities of the ALR personnel in medication management.

An ALA shall ensure that an initial assessment identifies whether a resident:

(1)

Is capable of self-administering his or her own medications;

(2)

Is capable of self-administering his or her own medication, but requires a reminder to take medications or requires physical assistance with opening and removing medications from the container, or both; or

(3)

Requires that medications be administered by a TME or a licensed nurse.

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 901, 47 DCR 2647